Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201454-1156
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-1156 to 54-1182 shall be known and
may be cited as the Livestock Auction Market Act.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 32, p. 973;

Laws 1985, LB 97, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 54-1186;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 78;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 20.